Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1481
List of registered lobbyists and principals; print in Legislative Journal; additional information; when.

(1) On the fourth legislative day of each legislative session, the Clerk of the Legislature shall insert the following in the Legislative Journal:

(a) A list of the names of all lobbyists whose registration is then in effect;

(b) The name of the principal in whose behalf the lobbyist is registered; and

(c) Any additional information as directed by the Legislature.

(2) On the last legislative day of each week after the fourth legislative day, the clerk shall cause to be inserted in the Legislative Journal the names of any additional lobbyists and principals who have registered or who have changed their registration.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 81;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 31.